District of Columbia statutes.
10-1003

Repealed

Functions.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1804, 45 DCR 7193
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3102(a), 51 DCR 8441
June 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-127, § 3(a), 53 DCR 4712
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 37(a), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-115, § 3(b), 57 DCR 886
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226
1981 Ed., § 9-1103.
For temporary addition of section, see § 1404 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and § 1404 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 11, see notes following § 10-1001.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3102(a) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3102(a) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).
Short title of subtitle A of title III of Law 15-205: Section 3101 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle A of title III of the act may be cited as the Government Facility Security Amendment Act of 2004.